District of Columbia statutes.
38-1313

Transfer of the Education Licensure Commission from the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs to the State Education Office.

(a)

All positions, personnel, property, records and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs that support the functions of the Education Licensure Commission, established by § 38-1303 are hereby transferred to the State Education Office, established by § 38-2601.

(b)

All of the powers, duties, and functions delegated to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs concerning the activities of the Education Licensure Commission, including those delegated pursuant to this chapter, are hereby transferred to the State Education Office [now Office of the State Superintendent of Education], established by § 38-2601.

History

Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 12a
as added Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 303, 50 DCR 5668
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 84(a), 52 DCR 2638
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4002(b), 52 DCR 7503

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-33, in the section heading, subsec. (a), and subsec (b), substituted “Education” for “Educational”.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(i) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law (Act 21-172), Jan. _, 2016, 62 DCR 13983).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 303 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 303 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(i) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-158, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13715).